Florida, session 2026, SB1620.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 33 34 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 35 112.3135, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 36 112.3135âRestriction on employment of relatives.â 37 (1)âIn this section, unless the context otherwise requires: 38 (a)ââAgencyâ means: 39 1.âA state agency, except an institution under the 40 jurisdiction of the Board of Governors of the State University 41 System; 42 2.âAn office, agency, or other establishment in the 43 legislative branch; 44 3.âAn office, agency, or other establishment in the 45 judicial branch; 46 4.âA county; 47 5.âA city; and 48 6.âA district school board; and 49 7.âAny other political subdivision of the state, except a 50 district school board or community college district. 51 Section 2.âSection 1001.366, Florida Statutes, is created 52 to read: 53 1001.366âDistrict School Board Membersâ Bill of Rights.â 54 (1)âThe Legislature finds it necessary to adopt a âDistrict 55 School Board Membersâ Bill of Rightsâ to clarify and expand the 56 rights of individual school board members in the exercise of 57 their statutory oversight and responsibility. 58 (2)âA member of a district school board has the right to: 59 (a)1.âUpon request, be given free and timely access to all 60 school district documents. Access must include documents that 61 are not public records, including, but not limited to, notes, 62 invoices, correspondences, memoranda, and internal legal 63 opinions. 64 2.âRequest any document or information from the district 65 school superintendent or the superintendentâs staff. 66 (b)âConsult with the school districtâs chief financial 67 officer on general matters related to the budget, and sources 68 and uses of school district funds, and have access, upon 69 request, to any detail or line item in any proposed or approved 70 budget or in any financial transaction by the school district. 71 (c)âSeek information from school district staff without the 72 permission of the superintendent or other members of the 73 administration. 74 (d)âConfidentially use any school district electronic or 75 communications device, such as a cellular telephone or laptop 76 computer, without the school district monitoring its use. This 77 paragraph may not be construed to violate any public records 78 law. 79 (e)âKeep confidential the content of all communications or 80 discussions relating to union contracts of school district 81 employees, unless otherwise advised by an attorney employed by 82 the school district. 83 (f)âComment publicly during or outside of district school 84 board meetings on any matter of district school board business, 85 except for student and employee disciplinary hearings that are 86 specifically addressed in ss. 1006.07 and 1012.34, respectively. 87 (3)(a)âAn attorney may not be employed by the school 88 district and represent the district school board, except for an 89 attorney hired pursuant to s. 1001.42(5). 90 (b)âIn any legal action brought against an individual 91 school board member related to his or her official position and 92 conduct, the school board may authorize an attorney, in 93 accordance with paragraph (a), who is employed by the school 94 district, to provide legal representation. 95 Section 3.âSubsection (5) is added to section 1001.372, 96 Florida Statutes, to read: 97 1001.372âDistrict school board meetings.â 98 (5)âCOMMUNICATIONS ABOUT AGENDA ITEMS.âA member of the 99 district school board may have communications or discussions 100 relating to any item or action scheduled to be heard or likely 101 to be heard at a future school board meeting with the district 102 school superintendent, an attorney employed by the school 103 district, or district staff, if an attorney employed by the 104 school district pursuant to s. 1001.42(5)(c) has advised the 105 school board member that such communications or discussions 106 would not violate s. 24(b), Art. I of the State Constitution. 107 Section 4.âSubsection (6) of section 1001.42, Florida 108 Statutes, is amended, paragraph (c) is added to subsection (1) 109 of that section, paragraph (c) is added to subsection (5) of 110 that section, and paragraph (c) is added to subsection (24) of 111 that section, to read: 112 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 113 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 114 powers and perform all duties listed below: 115 (1)âREQUIRE MINUTES AND RECORDS TO BE KEPT.âRequire the 116 district school superintendent, as secretary, to keep such 117 minutes and records as are necessary to set forth clearly all 118 actions and proceedings of the school board. 119 (c)âOther records.âOther documents, including attachments 120 for agenda items, such as vendor contracts or budget documents, 121 must be kept as a public record with the minutes of each 122 meeting. 123 (5)âPERSONNEL.â 124 (c)âDuring a regular school board meeting, approve the 125 employment of an additional attorney, to be employed by the 126 school district solely to represent the district school board, 127 who was recommended for employment by an attorney currently 128 employed by the school district. During the meeting, the 129 district school board must provide both of the following: 130 1.âThe purpose of hiring an additional attorney. 131 2.âThe costs of such representation. Any payment to the 132 additional attorney must be noticed and approved by the district 133 school board. 134 (6)âSTANDARDS OF ETHICAL CONDUCT.âAdopt policies 135 establishing standards of ethical conduct for educational 136 support employees, instructional personnel, administrative 137 personnel, and school officers. The policies must require all 138 educational support employees, instructional personnel, 139 administrative personnel, and school officers, as defined in s. 140 1012.01, to complete training on the standards, including 141 training for school officers in compliance with s. 24(b), Art. I 142 of the State Constitution; establish the duty of educational 143 support employees, instructional personnel, administrative 144 personnel, and school officers to report, and procedures for 145 reporting, alleged misconduct by other educational support 146 employees, instructional or administrative personnel, and school 147 officers which affects the health, safety, or welfare of a 148 student, including misconduct that involves engaging in or 149 soliciting sexual, romantic, or lewd conduct with a student; 150 require the district school superintendent to report to law 151 enforcement misconduct by educational support employees, 152 instructional personnel, or school administrators that would 153 result in disqualification from educator certification or 154 employment as provided in s. 1012.315; and include an 155 explanation of the liability protections provided under ss. 156 39.203 and 768.095. A district school board, or any of its 157 employees or personnel, may not enter into a confidentiality 158 agreement regarding terminated or dismissed educational support 159 employees, instructional or administrative personnel, or school 160 officers who resign in lieu of termination, based in whole or in 161 part on misconduct that affects the health, safety, or welfare 162 of a student, and may not provide educational support employees, 163 instructional personnel, administrative personnel, or school 164 officers with employment references or discuss the employeesâ, 165 personnelâs, or officersâ performance with prospective employers 166 in another educational setting, without disclosing the 167 employeesâ, personnelâs, or officersâ misconduct. Any part of an 168 agreement or contract that has the purpose or effect of 169 concealing misconduct by educational support employees, 170 instructional personnel, administrative personnel, or school 171 officers which affects the health, safety, or welfare of a 172 student is void, is contrary to public policy, and may not be 173 enforced. 174 (24)âEMPLOYMENT CONTRACTS.â 175 (c)âA school board member may not publicly disclose 176 proposed terms of collective bargaining agreements unless 177 advised by an attorney employed pursuant to paragraph (5)(c). 178 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 179 1011.035, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 180 1011.035âSchool district fiscal transparency.â 181 (2)âEach district school board shall post on its website a 182 plain language version of each proposed, tentative, and official 183 budget which describes each budget item in terms that are easily 184 understandable to the public and includes: 185 (a)âGraphical representations, for each public school 186 within the district and for the school district, of the 187 following: 188 1.âSummary financial efficiency data. 189 2.âFiscal trend information for the previous 3 years on: 190 a.âThe ratio of full-time equivalent students to full-time 191 equivalent instructional personnel. 192 b.âThe ratio of full-time equivalent students to full-time 193 equivalent administrative personnel. 194 c.âThe total operating expenditures per full-time 195 equivalent student. 196 d.âThe total instructional expenditures per full-time 197 equivalent student. 198 e.âThe general administrative expenditures as a percentage 199 of total budget. 200 f.âThe rate of change in the general fundâs ending fund 201 balance not classified as restricted. 202 g.âFull line-item budget items. 203 204 This information must be prominently posted on the school 205 districtâs website in a manner that is readily accessible to the 206 public. 207 Section 6.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 208 1012.22, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 209 1012.22âPublic school personnel; powers and duties of the 210 district school board.âThe district school board shall: 211 (1)âDesignate positions to be filled, prescribe 212 qualifications for those positions, and provide for the 213 appointment, compensation, promotion, suspension, and dismissal 214 of employees as follows, subject to the requirements of this 215 chapter: 216 (a)âPositions, qualifications, and appointments.â 217 1.âThe district school board shall act upon written 218 recommendations submitted by the district school superintendent 219 for positions to be filled, for minimum qualifications for 220 personnel for the various positions, and for the persons 221 nominated to fill such positions. 222 2.âThe district school board may reject for good cause any 223 employee nominated. 224 3.âIf the third nomination by the district school 225 superintendent for any position is rejected for good cause, if 226 the district school superintendent fails to submit a nomination 227 for initial employment within a reasonable time as prescribed by 228 the district school board, or if the district school 229 superintendent fails to submit a nomination for reemployment 230 within the time prescribed by law, the district school board may 231 proceed on its own motion to fill such position. 232 4.âThe district school boardâs decision to reject a 233 personâs nomination does not give that person a right of action 234 to sue over the rejection and may not be used as a cause of 235 action by the nominated employee. 236 5.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term âgood 237 causeâ means the district school board has determined any of the 238 following: 239 a.âThat the nominated employee received his or her 240 nomination due to nepotism, as defined by the district school 241 board. 242 b.âThat the nominated employee fabricated or materially 243 exaggerated his or her credentials or background. 244 c.âThat the nominated employee does not meet the minimum 245 requirements for the position. 246 d.âThat the nominated employeeâs educator certificate has 247 been revoked by another state. 248 Section 7.âSubsection (1) of section 1015.03, Florida 249 Statutes, is amended to read: 250 1015.03âRights of employment.â 251 (1)(a)âPursuant to s. 447.301 and s. 6., Art. I of the 252 State Constitution, the right of public employees, including 253 teachers, to work may not be denied or abridged on account of 254 membership or nonmembership in any labor union. 255 (b)âA school district employee may not be required or 256 otherwise incentivized to sign a nondisclosure agreement or 257 confidentiality agreement. 258 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.